Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-260
Town board; compensation of officers; fixed by town board.

The members of the town board shall be entitled to a per diem as fixed by the town board at its annual meeting.

Laws 1895, c. 28, §§ 59, 60, p. 148;

Laws 1913, c. 54, § 2, p. 162;

R.S.1913, § 1044;

C.S.1922, § 946;

C.S.1929, § 26-260;

R.S.1943, § 23-260;

Laws 1953, c. 52, § 4, p. 181;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 15.